test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kuld38_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuld: # Noun (38) kuld 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kuld+N+Sg+Nom: kuld
     kuld+N+Sg+Gen: kulla
     kuld+N+Sg+Par: kulda
     kuld+N+Sg+Ill: kulda
     kuld+N+Sg+Ine: [kullan, kullah, kullahn]
     kuld+N+Sg+Ela: kullast
     kuld+N+Sg+All: kullalõ
     kuld+N+Sg+Ade: kullal
     kuld+N+Sg+Abl: kullalt
     kuld+N+Sg+Tra: kullas
     kuld+N+Sg+Ter: kullaniq
     kuld+N+Sg+Abe: kullaldaq
     kuld+N+Sg+Com: kullagaq
     kuld+N+Pl+Nom: kullaq
     kuld+N+Pl+Gen: kuldõ
     kuld+N+Pl+Par: kuldõ
     kuld+N+Pl+Ill: [kuldõhe, kuldõ, kuldõdõ]
     kuld+N+Pl+Ine: [kullõn, kullõh, kullõhn]
     kuld+N+Pl+Ela: kullõst
     kuld+N+Pl+All: kullõlõ
     kuld+N+Pl+Ade: kullõl
     kuld+N+Pl+Abl: kullõlt
     kuld+N+Pl+Tra: kullõs
     kuld+N+Pl+Ter: kullõniq
     kuld+N+Pl+Abe: kullõldaq
     kuld+N+Pl+Com: kuldõgaq
